Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Chapter 1 General Provisions

Cross references. —

For provision prohibiting the legislature from delegating power to perform municipal functions, see art. 3, § 37, Wyo. Const.

For provision that no person except a qualified elector shall be elected or appointed to any civil or military office in the state, see art. 6, § 15, Wyo. Const.

As to when officer to hold over, and as to suspension of officers of state and municipality, see art. 6, § 16, Wyo. Const.

As to method of selecting officers whose election is not provided for in the constitution, see art. 6, § 18, Wyo. Const.

For provision that neither the state, nor any county, township, school district or municipality shall loan or give its credit or make donations to or in aid of any railroad or telegraph line, see art. 10, § 15, Wyo. Const.

For constitutional provisions relative to municipal corporations generally, see art. 13, §§ 1 to 5, Wyo. Const.

As to consolidation of offices in state, county and municipalities, see art. 14, § 6, Wyo. Const.

For provisions limiting city tax levy, see art. 15, § 6, Wyo. Const.

For provision that the power of taxation shall never be surrendered or suspended by any grant or contract to which the state or any county or any other municipal corporation shall be a party, see art. 15, § 14, Wyo. Const.

As to creation of municipal debt in excess of taxes for current year, see art. 16, § 4, Wyo. Const.

As to limitation on municipal debt, see art. 16, § 5, Wyo. Const.

For provision prohibiting loans or credit donations by state or any political subdivision thereof and requiring two-thirds vote of people for works of internal improvement, see art. 16, § 6, Wyo. Const.

As to eminent domain generally, see §§

1-26-501

through

1-26-817

and Rule 71.1, W.R.C.P.

As to actions by or against the state, state agencies and political subdivisions generally, see §§

1-35-101

to

1-35-108

.

As to exemption of state, counties and municipalities, and their departments and agencies, from requirements of depositing security for damages, etc., in any civil, criminal or special proceeding generally, see §

1-35-108

.

As to municipal courts generally, see ch. 6 of title 5.

As to unlawful conduct within governmental facilities, see §§

6-6-301

through

6-6-307

.

For the Wyoming Community Development Authority Act, see §§

9-7-101

through

9-7-125

.

For provision empowering local governmental units to cooperate with each other and with United States, see §

16-1-101

.

For the Wyoming Joint Powers Act, see §§

16-1-102

through

16-1-110

.

For provisions relating to meetings of governmental agencies, see §§

16-4-401

through

16-4-408

.

As to county government generally, see title 18.

As to municipal elections generally, see §§

22-23-101

to

22-23-1007

.

For provisions relating to county, municipal and district health departments, see §§

35-1-301

to

35-1-309

.

As to community human services, see §§

35-1-611

to

35-1-628

.

As to municipal cemetery generally, see §§

35-8-201

to

35-8-212

.

Law reviews. —

For note on home rule as a solution for municipal problems, see 16 Wyo. L.J. 47 (1961).

For article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 229 (1972).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations §§ 1 to 878.

Acquisition by adverse possession or use of public property held by municipal corporation or other governmental unit otherwise than for streets, alleys, parks or commons, 55 ALR2d 554.

Municipal property as subject to mechanic's lien, 51 ALR3d 657.